Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 46 Dry Dock Facilities

34-46-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Dry Dock Facilities Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 369, § 1.

34-46-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Default” means the failure to pay obligations incurred by the storage of a vessel and associated charges.

“Dry dock” means any space and/or real property designed and/or used for the purpose of renting or leasing storage space for vessels.

“Facility” means a marina, boatyard, or marine repair facility that provides, as part of its commercial operation, the storage of vessels.

“Last known address” means that address provided by the owner in the latest storage agreement or the address provided by the owner in a subsequent notice of a change of address.

“Lien holder” means a person holding a security interest.

“Operator” means the proprietor, operator, lessor, or sublessor of a dry dock facility, his or her agent, or any other person authorized by him or her to manage the facility or to receive rent from the owner under a rental agreement.

“Owner” means a person, other than a lienholder, having a property interest in or title to a vessel. The term includes a person entitled to use or have possession of a vessel subject to an interest in another person, reserved, or created by agreement and securing payment or performance of an obligation, but it does not include a lessee under a lease not intended as security.

“Personal property” means movable property not affixed to land and includes, but is not limited to equipment, goods, furniture, and household items whether affixed to the vessel or not.

“Storage agreement” means any written agreement or lease that establishes or modifies the terms, conditions, rules, or any other provisions concerning the storage of a vessel in a dry dock facility.

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water and any personal property located thereon and shall include its appurtenances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch 369, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

34-46-3.
Lien.

Lien created. A facility operator has a lien on a vessel stored at that facility for storage charges, labor, or other charges and for expenses reasonably incurred in the sale of that vessel under the provisions of this chapter.

Exclusion. This chapter does not create a lien on a documented vessel subject to a preferred ship mortgage or other preferred maritime lien pursuant to 46 U.S.C. § 31301 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 162, § 3.

34-46-4.
Notice of lien.

A vessel owner must be notified of the lien created by this chapter before enforcement of the lien by a facility operator. Notification of the lien created by this chapter is satisfied by:

Written storage agreement. A written storage agreement signed by the vessel owner that includes the following language in bold, capitalized font: “BEWARE — THE VESSEL AND ITS CONTENTS MAY BE SOLD AT PUBLIC AUCTION FOR FAILURE TO PAY STORAGE CHARGES PURSUANT TO THE DRY DOCK FACILITIES ACT, CHAPTER 46 OF TITLE 34.”; or

Written notice of lien. Written notification of the lien sent by the facility operator to the last known address of the vessel owner and, where applicable, to the last known address of the person or entity the facility operator has on record as being responsible for the vessel, if different from the vessel’s registered owner.

A facility operator who does not have a written storage agreement that includes a notice of the lien created by this chapter may not initiate an enforcement action under §

34-46-5

until thirty (30) days after the delivery of written notice of the lien pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 162, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

34-46-5.
Enforcement of lien.

A facility operator may enforce a lien created by this chapter only if the notice requirement set forth in §

34-46-4

is satisfied.

Sale — Use of proceeds.

If a vessel owner is in default for a period of more than ninety (90) days, a facility operator may enforce a lien by selling the vessel at a commercially reasonable public sale for cash. As used in this section, “commercially reasonable” shall have the same meaning as in the Uniform Commercial Code. The proceeds of the sale shall be applied in the following order:

To the reasonable expenses of the sale incurred by the facility operator including, but not limited to, reasonable attorneys’ fees, legal expenses, and expenses of advertisement;

To the satisfaction of the lien created by this chapter;

To the satisfaction of all other liens on the vessel held by all lienholders of record to be paid in the order of priority; and

To the extent that the proceeds of sale exceed the sum of the foregoing, the surplus must be paid by the facility operator to the vessel owner. Where the surplus is not collected within thirty (30) days of the sale, the facility operator shall provide the funds to the general treasurer as unclaimed property.

If proceeds of the sale are not sufficient to satisfy the vessel owner’s outstanding obligations to the facility operator or any lienholder of record, the vessel owner remains liable to the facility operator and/or lienholder for the deficiency.

Advertisement — Notice of default. Before conducting a sale under this section, the facility operator shall:

Personally serve a notice of default on the vessel owner if the vessel owner is a Rhode Island resident, and where applicable, personally serve a notice of default on the person or entity the facility operator has on record as being responsible for the vessel if different from the vessel’s registered owner, if the person or entity is a Rhode Island resident.

After a licensed process server makes three (3) attempts at personal service on different days and at different times of the day at the last known address of the vessel owner and the person or entity the facility operator has on record as being responsible for the vessel if different than that of the vessel’s registered owner, service will be deemed effectuated by leaving a copy of the notice of default in the door of the residence and mailing a copy of the notice of default in accordance with subsection (7) of this section.

The licensed process server will provide an affidavit detailing the attempts at personal service including the date, time, and location of each attempt, efforts to find an alternate address for service, where and when the notice was left, and the mailing of the notice. The notice will be deemed delivered on the date the notice is left at the residence.

In the event that either the vessel owner or the person or entity the facility operator has on record as being responsible for the vessel if different from the vessel’s registered owner are not Rhode Island resident(s), notice shall be in accordance with subsection (7) of this section. The facility operator shall provide a copy of the notice to each lienholder of record. In addition, the facility operator shall affix a copy of the notice of default on the outside of the vessel in a manner where it can be reasonably seen.

The notice of default must include:

A statement that the vessel is subject to a lien held by the facility operator;

A statement of the facility operator’s claim indicating the charges due on the date of the notice, the amount of any additional charges that will or may become due before the date of sale, and the date those additional charges will become due;

A demand for payment of the charges due within a specified time not less than thirty (30) days after the date the last notice of default required hereunder is delivered to the vessel owner or the person or entity the facility operator has on record as being responsible for the vessel;

A statement that unless the claim is paid within the time stated the vessel will be sold, specifying the time and place of the sale; and

The name, street address, and telephone number of the facility operator, or the facility operator’s designated agent, whom the vessel owner or the person or entity the facility operator has on record as being responsible for the vessel may contact to respond to the notice.

After the expiration of the thirty-day (30) period set forth in subsection (2)(iii)(C) of this section, the facility operator shall publish an advertisement of the sale once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the area where the sale is to be held and of general circulation in the state. The advertisement must include a general description of the vessel, the name of the vessel owner, and, if applicable, the person or entity the facility operator has on record as being responsible for the vessel and the date, time, and place of the sale. The date of the sale must be more than fifteen (15) days after the date the first advertisement of the sale is published. In addition, the facility operator shall affix a copy of the advertisement on the outside of the vessel in a manner where it can be reasonably seen.

Location of sale. A sale under this chapter shall be held at the facility or at the nearest suitable location.

Purchasers. A purchaser of a vessel sold at a sale pursuant to this chapter takes the vessel free and clear of any rights of persons against whom the lien was valid and all other lienholders of record.

Facility operator liability. If the facility operator complies with the provisions of this chapter, the facility operator’s liability is as follows:

To a lienholder of record, the facility operator’s liability is limited to payment from the net proceeds received from the sale of the vessel pursuant to this section; and

To the vessel owner, the facility operator’s liability is limited to the net proceeds received from the sale of the vessel after payment in full of all lienholders of record pursuant to this section.

Denying access to storage facility. A facility operator may deny a vessel owner who has been notified under §

34-46-4

access to the storage facility, except that the vessel owner or responsible party is entitled to access to the facility during normal business hours for the purpose of satisfying the lien or viewing and verifying the condition of the vessel.

Notices. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), all notices required by this chapter must be served by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested or by a recognized commercial courier with proof of signed-for delivery. Notices sent to a facility operator must be sent to the facility operator’s business address or to the address of the facility operator’s designated representative. Notices to a vessel owner or the person or entity the facility operator has on record as being responsible for the vessel must be sent to the person’s or entity’s last known address. Notices to a lienholder of record must be sent to the address of the lienholder as provided in the public filings that serve to perfect the lienholder’s interest in the vessel. The lienholder’s identity and address that the department of environmental management has in its records shall be provided to the facility operator upon written request and certification that the request is made solely for the purposes of complying with the provisions of this chapter. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, notices are considered delivered on the date the return receipt or proof of delivery is signed or, if the notice is undeliverable, the date the post office or commercial courier last attempts to deliver the notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 162, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

34-46-6.
Cessation of enforcement actions.

A facility operator shall cease enforcement actions immediately upon any of the following:

Payment by owner. The vessel owner pays the facility operator the full amount necessary to satisfy the lien on the date payment is tendered. At any time before the conclusion of a sale conducted under this chapter, the vessel owner may redeem the vessel by paying the full amount of the lien on the date payment is tendered;

Payment by other lienholders. A person other than the facility operator who has a lien on the vessel pays the facility operator the full amount necessary to satisfy the lien held by the facility operator. Upon payment by a lienholder of record, the facility operator shall hold the vessel for the benefit of and at the direction of that lienholder and may not deliver possession of the vessel to the vessel owner. Unless the facility operator and the lienholder enter into a new storage agreement, the lienholder shall arrange removal of the vessel from the facility forthwith; or

Initiation of civil action. An owner of a vessel or one claiming ownership rights in the vessel files in a court of competent jurisdiction and serves on the facility operator, not less than ten (10) days before the scheduled date of sale, a complaint against the facility operator relating to the obligations incurred by the storage of the vessel or any claims related to the vessel and in such complaint objects to the enforcement of the lien and sets forth the legal reasons why the lien should not be enforced. The enforcement action shall not resume until either the civil action is resolved or the court enters an order permitting the enforcement action to proceed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 162, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 20; P.L. 2021, ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

34-46-7.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 369, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-46-5

; P.L. 1994, ch. 162, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 102, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 103, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.